Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-181
Freeze brand, defined.

Freeze brand means a mark or brand that is created on a live animal in a depigmentation technique, whereby the pigment-producing cells in the skin of an animal are destroyed by the application of intense cold to the skin area.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 12.